Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2794.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.61, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Sale and purchase. (a) "Sale" and "purchase" include, but are not limited to, each of the transactions listed in this subdivision. In applying the provisions of this chapter, the terms "tangible personal property" and "retail sale" include the taxable services listed in paragraph (g), clause (6), items (i) to (vi) and (viii), and the provision of these taxable services, unless specifically provided otherwise. Services performed by an employee for an employer are not taxable. Services performed by a partnership or association for another partnership or association are not taxable if one of the entities owns or controls more than 80 percent of the voting power of the equity interest in the other entity. Services performed between members of an affiliated group of corporations are not taxable. For purposes of the preceding sentence, "affiliated group of corporations" means those entities that would be classified as members of an affiliated group as defined under United States Code, title 26, section 1504, disregarding the exclusions in section 1504(b). (b) Sale and purchase include: (1) any transfer of title or possession, or both, of tangible personal property, whether absolutely or conditionally, for a consideration in money or by exchange or barter; and (2) the leasing of or the granting of a license to use or consume, for a consideration in money or by exchange or barter, tangible personal property, other than a manufactured home used for residential purposes for a continuous period of 30 days or more. (c) Sale and purchase include the production, fabrication, printing, or processing of tangible personal property for a consideration for consumers who furnish either directly or indirectly the materials used in the production, fabrication, printing, or processing. (d) Sale and purchase include the preparing for a consideration of food. Notwithstanding section 297A.67, subdivision 2, taxable food includes, but is not limited to, the following: (1) prepared food sold by the retailer; (2) soft drinks;new text begin andnew text end (3) candydeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (4) dietary supplements. deleted text end (e) A sale and a purchase includes the furnishing for a consideration of electricity, gas, water, or steam for use or consumption within this state. (f) A sale and a purchase includes the transfer for a consideration of prewritten computer software whether delivered electronically, by load and leave, or otherwise. (g) A sale and a purchase includes the furnishing for a consideration of the following services: (1) the privilege of admission to places of amusement, recreational areas, or athletic events, and the making available of amusement devices, tanning facilities, reducing salons, steam baths, health clubs, and spas or athletic facilities; (2) lodging and related services by a hotel, rooming house, resort, campground, motel, or trailer camp, including furnishing the guest of the facility with access to telecommunication services, and the granting of any similar license to use real property in a specific facility, other than the renting or leasing of it for a continuous period of 30 days or more under an enforceable written agreement that may not be terminated without prior notice and including accommodations intermediary services provided in connection with other services provided under this clause; (3) nonresidential parking services, whether on a contractual, hourly, or other periodic basis, except for parking at a meter; (4) the granting of membership in a club, association, or other organization if: (i) the club, association, or other organization makes available for the use of its members sports and athletic facilities, without regard to whether a separate charge is assessed for use of the facilities; and (ii) use of the sports and athletic facility is not made available to the general public on the same basis as it is made available to members. Granting of membership means both onetime initiation fees and periodic membership dues. Sports and athletic facilities include golf courses; tennis, racquetball, handball, and squash courts; basketball and volleyball facilities; running tracks; exercise equipment; swimming pools; and other similar athletic or sports facilities; (5) delivery of aggregate materials by a third party, excluding delivery of aggregate material used in road construction; and delivery of concrete block by a third party if the delivery would be subject to the sales tax if provided by the seller of the concrete block. For purposes of this clause, "road construction" means construction of: (i) public roads; (ii) cartways; and (iii) private roads in townships located outside of the seven-county metropolitan area up to the point of the emergency response location sign; and (6) services as provided in this clause: (i) laundry and dry cleaning services including cleaning, pressing, repairing, altering, and storing clothes, linen services and supply, cleaning and blocking hats, and carpet, drapery, upholstery, and industrial cleaning. Laundry and dry cleaning services do not include services provided by coin operated facilities operated by the customer; (ii) motor vehicle washing, waxing, and cleaning services, including services provided by coin operated facilities operated by the customer, and rustproofing, undercoating, and towing of motor vehicles; (iii) building and residential cleaning, maintenance, and disinfecting services and pest control and exterminating services; (iv) detective, security, burglar, fire alarm, and armored car services; but not including services performed within the jurisdiction they serve by off-duty licensed peace officers as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, or services provided by a nonprofit organization or any organization at the direction of a county for monitoring and electronic surveillance of persons placed on in-home detention pursuant to court order or under the direction of the Minnesota Department of Corrections; (v) pet grooming services; (vi) lawn care, fertilizing, mowing, spraying and sprigging services; garden planting and maintenance; tree, bush, and shrub pruning, bracing, spraying, and surgery; indoor plant care; tree, bush, shrub, and stump removal, except when performed as part of a land clearing contract as defined in section 297A.68, subdivision 40; and tree trimming for public utility lines. Services performed under a construction contract for the installation of shrubbery, plants, sod, trees, bushes, and similar items are not taxable; (vii) massages, except when provided by a licensed health care facility or professional or upon written referral from a licensed health care facility or professional for treatment of illness, injury, or disease; and (viii) the furnishing of lodging, board, and care services for animals in kennels and other similar arrangements, but excluding veterinary and horse boarding services. (h) A sale and a purchase includes the furnishing for a consideration of tangible personal property or taxable services by the United States or any of its agencies or instrumentalities, or the state of Minnesota, its agencies, instrumentalities, or political subdivisions. (i) A sale and a purchase includes the furnishing for a consideration of telecommunications services, ancillary services associated with telecommunication services, and pay television services. Telecommunication services include, but are not limited to, the following services, as defined in section 297A.669: air-to-ground radiotelephone service, mobile telecommunication service, postpaid calling service, prepaid calling service, prepaid wireless calling service, and private communication services. The services in this paragraph are taxed to the extent allowed under federal law. (j) A sale and a purchase includes the furnishing for a consideration of installation if the installation charges would be subject to the sales tax if the installation were provided by the seller of the item being installed. (k) A sale and a purchase includes the rental of a vehicle by a motor vehicle dealer to a customer when (1) the vehicle is rented by the customer for a consideration, or (2) the motor vehicle dealer is reimbursed pursuant to a service contract as defined in section 59B.02, subdivision 11. (l) A sale and a purchase includes furnishing for a consideration of specified digital products or other digital products or granting the right for a consideration to use specified digital products or other digital products on a temporary or permanent basis and regardless of whether the purchaser is required to make continued payments for such right. Wherever the term "tangible personal property" is used in this chapter, other than in subdivisions 10 and 38, the provisions also apply to specified digital products, or other digital products, unless specifically provided otherwise or the context indicates otherwise. (m) The sale of the privilege of admission under section 297A.61, subdivision 3, paragraph (g), clause (1), to a place of amusement, recreational area, or athletic event includes all charges included in the privilege of admission's sales price, without deduction for amenities that may be provided, unless the amenities are separately stated and the purchaser of the privilege of admission is entitled to add or decline the amenities, and the amenities are not otherwise taxable. (n) A sale and purchase includes the transfer for consideration of a taxable cannabis product as defined in section 295.81, subdivision 1, paragraph (r). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.61, subdivision 38, is amended to read: Subd. 38. Bundled transaction. (a) "Bundled transaction" means the retail sale of two or more products when the products are otherwise distinct and identifiable, and the products are sold for one nonitemized price. As used in this subdivision, "product" includes tangible personal property, services, intangibles, and digital goods, including specified digital products or other digital products, but does not include real property or services to real property. A bundled transaction does not include the sale of any products in which the sales price varies, or is negotiable, based on the selection by the purchaser of the products included in the transaction. (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "distinct and identifiable" products does not include: (1) packaging and other materials, such as containers, boxes, sacks, bags, and bottles, wrapping, labels, tags, and instruction guides, that accompany the retail sale of the products and are incidental or immaterial to the retail sale. Examples of packaging that are incidental or immaterial include grocery sacks, shoe boxes, dry cleaning garment bags, and express delivery envelopes and boxes; (2) a promotional product provided free of charge with the required purchase of another product. A promotional product is provided free of charge if the sales price of another product, which is required to be purchased in order to receive the promotional product, does not vary depending on the inclusion of the promotional product; and (3) items included in the definition of sales price. (c) For purposes of this subdivision, the term "one nonitemized price" does not include a price that is separately identified by product on binding sales or other supporting sales-related documentation made available to the customer in paper or electronic form including but not limited to an invoice, bill of sale, receipt, contract, service agreement, lease agreement, periodic notice of rates and services, rate card, or price list. (d) A transaction that otherwise meets the definition of a bundled transaction is not a bundled transaction if it is: (1) the retail sale of tangible personal property and a service and the tangible personal property is essential to the use of the service, and is provided exclusively in connection with the service, and the true object of the transaction is the service; (2) the retail sale of services if one service is provided that is essential to the use or receipt of a second service and the first service is provided exclusively in connection with the second service and the true object of the transaction is the second service; (3) a transaction that includes taxable products and nontaxable products and the purchase price or sales price of the taxable products is de minimis; or (4) the retail sale of exempt tangible personal property and taxable tangible personal property if: (i) the transaction includes food and food ingredients,new text begin dietary supplements,new text end drugs, durable medical equipment, mobility enhancing equipment, over-the-counter drugs, prosthetic devices, or medical supplies; and (ii) the seller's purchase price or sales price of the taxable tangible personal property is 50 percent or less of the total purchase price or sales price of the bundled tangible personal property. Sellers must not use a combination of the purchase price and sales price of the tangible personal property when making the 50 percent determination for a transaction. (e) For purposes of this subdivision, "purchase price" means the measure subject to use tax on purchases made by the seller, and "de minimis" means that the seller's purchase price or sales price of the taxable products is ten percent or less of the total purchase price or sales price of the bundled products. Sellers shall use either the purchase price or the sales price of the products to determine if the taxable products are de minimis. Sellers must not use a combination of the purchase price and sales price of the products to determine if the taxable products are de minimis. Sellers shall use the full term of a service contract to determine if the taxable products are de minimis. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.67, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Food and food ingredients. Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, food and food ingredients are exempt. For purposes of this subdivision, "food" and "food ingredients" mean substances, whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or dehydrated form, that are sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and are consumed for their taste or nutritional value. Food and food ingredients exempt under this subdivision do not include candy, soft drinks, dietary supplements, and prepared foods. Food and food ingredients do not include alcoholic beverages, tobacco, taxable cannabis products, medical cannabis flower, and medical cannabinoid products. For purposes of this subdivision, "alcoholic beverages" means beverages that are suitable for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of alcohol by volume. For purposes of this subdivision, "tobacco" means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco. For purposes of this subdivision, "taxable cannabis product" has the meaning given in section 295.81, subdivision 1, paragraph (r), "medical cannabis flower" has the meaning given in section 342.01, subdivision 54, and "medical cannabinoid product" has the meaning given in section 342.01, subdivision 52. For purposes of this subdivision, "dietary supplements" deleted text begin means any product, other than tobacco, intended to supplement the diet that:deleted text end new text begin has the meaning given in subdivision 41.new text end deleted text begin (1) contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients: deleted text end deleted text begin (i) a vitamin; deleted text end deleted text begin (ii) a mineral; deleted text end deleted text begin (iii) an herb or other botanical; deleted text end deleted text begin (iv) an amino acid; deleted text end deleted text begin (v) a dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by increasing the total dietary intake; and deleted text end deleted text begin (vi) a concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or combination of any ingredient described in items (i) to (v); deleted text end deleted text begin (2) is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder, softgel, gelcap, or liquid form, or if not intended for ingestion in such form, is not represented as conventional food and is not represented for use as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and deleted text end deleted text begin (3) is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement, identifiable by the supplement facts box found on the label and as required pursuant to Code of Federal Regulations, title 21, section 101.36. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.67, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 41. new text end new text begin Dietary supplements. new text end new text begin (a) Dietary supplements are exempt. new text end new text begin (b) For the purposes of this subdivision, "dietary supplements" means any product, other than tobacco, intended to supplement the diet that: new text end new text begin (1) contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients: new text end new text begin (i) a vitamin; new text end new text begin (ii) a mineral; new text end new text begin (iii) an herb or other botanical; new text end new text begin (iv) an amino acid; new text end new text begin (v) a dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by increasing the total dietary intake; and new text end new text begin (vi) a concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or combination of any ingredient described in items (i) to (v); new text end new text begin (2) is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder, softgel, gelcap, or liquid form, or if not intended for ingestion in such a form, is not represented as conventional food and is not represented for use as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and new text end new text begin (3) is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement, identifiable by the "Supplemental Facts" box found on the label and as required pursuant to Code of Federal Regulations, title 21, section 101.36. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end